Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall collect the  same information that the
department uses to administer ORS 327.013 (1)(b)(B) for all  individuals who are employed by
a school district or by an education service district.
(2) Upon receipt of a request to collect the information described in subsection (1)  of this
section, the school district or  education service district shall in a timely manner provide the
requested information to the department.
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2511 (HB 2511-INTRO) Page 1